Missouri, session 2026, HB3410.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 1.020 and 188.015, RSMo, are repealed and two new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 1.020 and 188.015, to read as follows:
1.020. As used in the statutory laws of this state, unless otherwise specially provided
or unless plainly repugnant to the intent of the legislature or to the context thereof:
(1) "Abortion":
(a) Means the act of using or prescribing any instrument, device, medicine, drug,
or any other means or substance with the intent to destroy the life of an embryo or fetus
in his or her mother's womb or the intentional termination of the pregnancy of a mother
by using or prescribing any instrument, device, medicine, drug, or other means or
substance with an intention other than to increase the probability of a live birth or to
remove a dead unborn child;
(b) Such use, prescription, or means is not an abortion if conducted with the
intent to:
a. Save the life or preserve the health of the unborn child;
b. Remove a dead unborn child caused by miscarriage;
c. Remove an ectopic pregnancy; or
d. Perform a pre-viability separation procedure when such procedure is
necessary to save the life of the pregnant woman or to prevent substantial or irreversible
physical impairment of a major bodily function of the pregnant woman;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3410 2
(c) For purposes of defining abortion:
a. "Ectopic pregnancy" means the state of carrying an unborn child outside of
the uterine cavity;
b. "Miscarriage" or "spontaneous abortion" means a spontaneous, natural,
nonintentional death of a preborn human being prior to twenty weeks gestation;
c. "Pregnant" or "pregnancy" means the state of carrying a developing human
being inside the female body;
d. "Pre-viability separation procedure" means a medical procedure performed
by a physician to remove an unborn child from his or her mother's uterine cavity before
that stage of fetal development when, in the reasonable medical judgment of the
physician based on the particular facts of the case before him or her and in light of the
most advanced medical technology and information available to him or her, there is a
reasonable likelihood of sustained survival of the unborn child outside the body of his or
her mother, with or without artificial support;
e. "Stillbirth" or "intrauterine fetal demise" means a spontaneous, natural,
nonintentional death of the preborn human being between twenty weeks gestation and
the moment of birth;
(2) "Certified mail" or "certified mail with return receipt requested", includes
certified mail carried by the United States Postal Service, or any parcel or letter carried by an
overnight, express, or ground delivery service that allows a sender or recipient to
electronically track its location and provides record of the signature of the recipient;
[(2)] (3) "County or circuit attorney" means prosecuting attorney;
[(3)] (4) "Executor" includes administrator where the subject matter applies to an
administrator;
[(4)] (5) "General election" means the election required to be held on the Tuesday
succeeding the first Monday of November, biennially;
[(5)] (6) "Guardian", if used in a section in a context relating to property rights or
obligations, means conservator of the estate as defined in chapter 475. "Guardianship", if
used in a section in a context relating to rights and obligations other than property rights or
obligations, means guardian of the person as defined in chapter 475;
[(6)] (7) "Handicap" means a mental or physical impairment that substantially limits
one or more major life activities, whether the impairment is congenital or acquired by
accident, injury, or disease, and where the impairment is verified by medical findings;
[(7)] (8) "Heretofore" means any time previous to the day when the statute containing
it takes effect; and "hereafter" means the time after the statute containing it takes effect;
[(8)] (9) "In vacation" includes any adjournment of court for more than one day
whenever any act is authorized to be done by or any power given to a court, or judge thereof

HB 3410 3
in vacation, or whenever any act is authorized to be done by or any power given to a clerk of
any court in vacation;
[(9)] (10) "Incompetent", if used in a section in a context relating to actual
occupational ability without reference to a court adjudication of incompetency, means the
actual ability of a person to perform in that occupation. "Incompetent", if used in a section in
a context relating to the property rights and obligations of a person, means a disabled person
as defined in chapter 475. "Incompetent", if used in a section in a context relating to the
rights and obligations of a person other than property rights and obligations, means an
incapacitated person as defined in chapter 475;
[(10)] (11) "Justice of the county court" means commissioner of the county
commission;
[(11)] (12) "Month" and "year". "Month" means a calendar month, and "year" means
a calendar year unless otherwise expressed, and is equivalent to the words year of our Lord;
[(12)] (13) The word "person" may extend and be applied to bodies politic and
corporate, and to partnerships and other unincorporated associations;
[(13)] (14) "Personal property" includes money, goods, chattels, things in action and
evidences of debt;
[(14)] (15) "Place of residence" means the place where the family of any person
permanently resides in this state, and the place where any person having no family generally
lodges;
[(15)] (16) "Preceding" and "following", when used by way of reference to any
section of the statutes, mean the section next preceding or next following that in which the
reference is made, unless some other section is expressly designated in the reference;
[(16)] (17) "Property" includes real and personal property;
[(17)] (18) "Real property" or "premises" or "real estate" or "lands" is coextensive
with lands, tenements and hereditaments;
[(18)] (19) "State", when applied to any of the United States, includes the District of
Columbia and the territories, and the words "United States" includes such district and
territories;
[(19)] (20) "Under legal disability" includes persons within the age of minority or of
unsound mind or imprisoned;
[(20)] (21) "Ward", if used in a section in a context relating to the property rights and
obligations of a person, means a protectee as defined in chapter 475. "Ward", if used in a
section in a context relating to the rights and obligations of a person other than property rights
and obligations, means a ward as defined in chapter 475;
[(21)] (22) "Will" includes the words testament and codicil;

HB 3410 4
[(22)] (23) "Written" and "in writing" and "writing word for word" includes printing,
lithographing, or other mode of representing words and letters, but in all cases where the
signature of any person is required, the proper handwriting of the person, or his mark, is
intended.
188.015. As used in this chapter, the following terms mean:
(1) (a) "Abortion"[:],
[(a)] the act of using or prescribing any instrument, device, medicine, drug, or any
other means or substance with the intent to destroy the life of an embryo or fetus in his or her
mother's womb[;] or
[(b)] the intentional termination of the pregnancy of a mother by using or prescribing
any instrument, device, medicine, drug, or other means or substance with an intention other
than to increase the probability of a live birth or to remove a dead unborn child;
(b) Such use, prescription, or means is not an "abortion" if conducted with the
intent to:
a. Save the life or preserve the health of the unborn child;
b. Remove a dead unborn child caused by miscarriage;
c. Remove an ectopic pregnancy; or
d. Perform a pre-viability separation procedure when such procedure is
necessary to save the life of the pregnant woman or to prevent substantial or irreversible
physical impairment of a major bodily function of the pregnant woman;
(c) For purposes of defining abortion:
a. "Ectopic pregnancy" means the state of carrying an unborn child outside of
the uterine cavity;
b. "Miscarriage" or "spontaneous abortion" means a spontaneous, natural,
nonintentional death of a preborn human being prior to twenty weeks gestation;
c. "Pregnant" or "pregnancy" means the state of carrying a developing human
being inside the female body;
d. "Pre-viability separation procedure" means a medical procedure performed
by a physician to remove an unborn child from his or her mother's uterine cavity before
that stage of fetal development when, in the reasonable medical judgment of the
physician based on the particular facts of the case before him or her and in light of the
most advanced medical technology and information available to him or her, there is a
reasonable likelihood of sustained survival of the unborn child outside the body of his or
her mother, with or without artificial support;
e. "Stillbirth" or "intrauterine fetal demise" means a spontaneous, natural,
nonintentional death of the preborn human being between twenty weeks gestation and
the moment of birth;

HB 3410 5
(2) "Abortion facility", a clinic, physician's office, or any other place or facility in
which abortions are performed or induced other than a hospital;
(3) "Affiliate", a person who or entity that enters into, with an abortion facility, a legal
relationship created or governed by at least one written instrument, including a certificate of
formation, a franchise agreement, standards of affiliation, bylaws, or a license, that
demonstrates:
(a) Common ownership, management, or control between the parties to the
relationship;
(b) A franchise granted by the person or entity to the affiliate; or
(c) The granting or extension of a license or other agreement authorizing the affiliate
to use the other person's or entity's brand name, trademark, service mark, or other registered
identification mark;
(4) "Conception", the fertilization of the ovum of a female by a sperm of a male;
(5) "Department", the department of health and senior services;
(6) "Down Syndrome", the same meaning as defined in section 191.923;
(7) "Gestational age", length of pregnancy as measured from the first day of the
woman's last menstrual period;
(8) "Medical emergency", a condition which, based on reasonable medical judgment,
so complicates the medical condition of a pregnant woman as to necessitate the immediate
abortion of her pregnancy to avert the death of the pregnant woman or for which a delay will
create a serious risk of substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily
function of the pregnant woman;
(9) "Physician", any person licensed to practice medicine in this state by the state
board of registration for the healing arts;
(10) "Reasonable medical judgment", a medical judgment that would be made by a
reasonably prudent physician, knowledgeable about the case and the treatment possibilities
with respect to the medical conditions involved;
(11) "Unborn child", the offspring of human beings from the moment of conception
until birth and at every stage of its biological development, including the human conceptus,
zygote, morula, blastocyst, embryo, and fetus;
(12) "Viability" or "viable", that stage of fetal development when the life of the
unborn child may be continued indefinitely outside the womb by natural or artificial life-
supportive systems;
(13) "Viable pregnancy" or "viable intrauterine pregnancy", in the first trimester of
pregnancy, an intrauterine pregnancy that can potentially result in a liveborn baby.
✔